Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) Notwithstanding the continuous appropriation of moneys in the Devel-
opmental Disabilities Community  Housing Fund established under ORS 427.340, the balance
of moneys remaining in the Community Housing Trust Account established  in ORS 427.340
on the effective date of this 2019 Act that are unexpended, unobligated  and not subject to
any conditions shall be transferred to the Oregon Community Foundation for the purposes
described in ORS 427.335. The foundation shall be  advised by and shall consult with the ad-
visory committee appointed under section 2 of this 2019 Act regarding any expenditures made
from the moneys transferred to the foundation under this section.
(2) The Oregon Community Foundation shall annually report to the Department of Hu-
man Services the balance  remaining of the moneys transferred under subsection (1) of this
section and the uses for expenditures made from the moneys transferred.  If the department
finds that any  expenditure is not authorized under the requirements of ORS 427.335, the
foundation must pay to the department the amount  of the unauthorized expenditure. The
department shall deposit the payment to the Developmental Disabilities  Community Housing
Fund.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Council on Developmental Disabilities  shall appoint an advisory
committee to advise and consult with the Oregon Community Foundation  in making ex-
penditures under section 1 of this 2019 Act. The committee  must include one individual each
to represent:
(1) Support services brokerages;
(2) Community developmental disability programs;
(3) Oregon coalitions consisting of individuals with intellectual or developmental disabili-
ties who encourage and facilitate self-advocacy by  individuals with intellectual or develop-
mental disabilities;
(4) Families of individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities;
(5) The Housing and Community Services Department;
(6) Community-based residential providers of services to individuals with  intellectual or
developmental disabilities; and
(7) The system described in ORS 192.517 (1).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 427.340 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 491 (SB 491-A) Page 1
427.340. (1) There is established a  Developmental Disabilities Community Housing Fund in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. All moneys in the  Developmental
Disabilities Community Housing Fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Human
Services to pay expenses incurred by the Department of Human Services in carrying out the pro-
visions of ORS 427.330 and 427.335. Interest earned on moneys in the fund shall  be credited to the
fund.
[(2) There is established within the fund a Community  Housing Trust Account. Notwithstanding
the provisions of ORS 270.150, the Department of Human Services  shall negotiate with the Oregon
Department of  Administrative Services to apply the proceeds from the sale, transfer or lease of any
surplus real property  owned, operated or controlled by the Department of Human Services and used
as a state training center to the account. The Department of Human Services  may expend, for the
purposes of ORS 427.330 to 427.345, any earnings credited to the  account, including any income from
the lease of surplus property and any  interest earned on moneys deposited in the account, and up to
five percent of  any sale or transfer proceeds initially credited to the account by the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services. At least 95 percent of all  sale or transfer proceeds shall remain in the ac-
count in perpetuity. ]
[(3)] (2) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Repayment of financial assistance provided to housing providers or care providers for com-
munity housing under ORS 427.335 (3);
[(c) Proceeds from the account under subsection (2) of this section; ]
[(d)] (c)  Moneys reallocated from other areas of the Department of Human  Services’ budget; and
[(e)] (d) Any earnings or interest credited to the fund.
[(4) Moneys in the Community Housing Trust Account  may, with the approval of the State Treas-
urer, be invested as provided under ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and the earnings from such  investments
must be credited to the Community Housing Trust Account. ]
[(5) The Department of Human Services  shall provide a report of revenues to and expenditures
from the fund as part of  its budget submission to the Governor and Legislative Assembly under ORS
chapter 291.]
SECTION 4.
ORS 427.345 is repealed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 491 (SB 491-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 491 (SB 491-A) Page 3